Washington statutes.
RCW 9.44.080

Misconduct in signing a petition.

In a situation not covered by RCW 29A.84.220, 29A.84.230, 29A.84.240, or 29A.84.250, every person who shall willfully sign the name of another person or of a fictitious person, or for any consideration, gratuity or reward shall sign his or her own name to or withdraw his or her name from any referendum or other petition circulated in pursuance of any law of this state or any municipal ordinance; or in signing his or her name to such petition shall willfully subscribe to any false statement concerning his or her age, citizenship, residence or other qualifications to sign the same; or knowing that any such petition contains any such false or wrongful signature or statement, shall file the same, or put the same off with intent that it should be filed, as a true and genuine petition, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2011 c 336 s 297; 1999 c 143 s 4; 1909 c 249 s 337; RRS s 2589.]

NOTES:

Forgery: RCW 9A.60.020.

Initiative and referendum petition forgery: RCW 29A.84.230, 29A.84.250.

Recall petition forgery: RCW 29A.84.240, 29A.84.220.